Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2808
Nebraska Crop Improvement Association; purpose.

The general purposes of the Nebraska Crop Improvement Association are (1) to carry on all activities incident to the certification of crop seeds as authorized by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources under rules and regulations approved by such college, (2) to maintain and make available to the public, through certification, high quality seeds of superior crop varieties so grown and distributed as to ensure genetic identity and genetic purity, (3) to publicize, advertise, and otherwise promote the merits and use of certified seed, and (4) to carry on educational work for improving the agronomic practices and furthering agricultural interests in the state.

Laws 1969, c. 2, § 8, p. 64.